Utah statutes.
53-6-305.   Local governments -- Option -- Higher minimum standards.
(1)  Participation in dispatcher training and certification under this part is
at the option of the legislative body of each county or municipality that
employs dispatchers.
(2)  The minimum standards in this part concerning dispatcher qualifications
and training do not preclude counties or municipalities from establishing
standards higher than the minimum standards contained in this part.
